Mississippi, session 2026, HB4084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the governing authorities of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with the projects in Northwest Jackson described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.. $ 1,525,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated in Section 1 of this act shall be used by the governing authorities of the City of Jackson for the following economic development and expansion projects in Northwest Jackson: (a)  Improvements to Grove Park and its recreational facilities.................................................. $ 500,000.00. (b)  Installation of surveillance cameras in strategic public areas.............................................. $ 25,000.00. (c)  Repair and maintenance of bridges and sidewalks... ................................................ $ 1,000,000.00. TOTAL........................................... $ 1,525,000.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.